Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.969, subdivision 32, is amended to read: Subd. 32. Biological products for cell and gene therapy. (a) deleted text begin Effective July 1, 2025, and upon necessary federal approval of documentation required to enter into a value-based arrangement under section 256B.0625, subdivision 13k,deleted text end The commissioner deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin shallnew text end provide separate reimbursement to hospitals for biological products provided in the inpatient hospital setting as part of cell or gene therapy to treat rare diseases, as defined in United States Code, title 21, section 360bbdeleted text begin , if the drug manufacturer enters into a value-based arrangement with the commissionerdeleted text end . (b) deleted text begin The commissioner shall establish the separate reimbursement rate for biological products provided under paragraph (a) based on the methodology used for drugs administered in an outpatient setting under section 256B.0625, subdivision 13e, paragraph (e).deleted text end new text begin Hospitals must be paid the actual acquisition cost for biological products provided under paragraph (a).new text end